Tennessee, session 114, SB0624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 50, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
An individual holding an elected office of a local government shall not hold
another elected office in this state at the same time. Individuals holding more than one
(1) office on the effective date of this act may continue holding such offices until the
terms expire. This prohibition does not apply to an office in a political party's state
executive committee.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0624
001733
- 1 -